Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 2. Gambling Offenses.

Collateral references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Gambling, § 1 et seq.

27 C.J.S., Disorderly Houses, § 1 et seq.

38 C.J.S., Gaming, § 1 et seq.

Entrapment to commit offense with respect to gambling or lotteries, 31 ALR2d 1212.

Criminal conspiracies as to gambling, 91 ALR2d 1148.

Bridge as within gambling laws, 97 ALR2d 1420.

Paraphernalia or appliances used for recording gambling transactions or receiving or furnishing gambling information as gaming “devices” within criminal statute or ordinance, 1 ALR3d 726.

Validity of criminal legislation making possession of gambling or lottery devices or paraphernalia presumptive or prima facie evidence of other incriminating facts, 17 ALR3d 491.

Gambling in private residence as prohibited or permitted by antigambling laws, 27 ALR3d 1074.

Promotion schemes of retail stores as criminal offense under antigambling laws, 29 ALR3d 888.

Validity and construction of statute exempting gambling operations carried on by religious, charitable, or other nonprofit organizations from general prohibitions against gambling, 42 ALR3d 663.

Construction and application of state or municipal enactments relating to policy or numbers games, 70 ALR3d 897.

Criminal liability of member or agent of private club or association, or of owner or lessor of its premises, for violation of state or local liquor or gambling laws thereon, 98 ALR3d 694.

Sec. 11.66.200.
Gambling.

A person commits the offense of gambling if the person engages in unlawful gambling.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that the defendant was a player in a social game.

Gambling is a violation

for the first offense;

punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000 for the second and each subsequent offense.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 41 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

Definition of “unlawful,” “gambling,” “player,” “social game” — AS

11.66.280

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “violation” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Promoting gambling in the first and second degree — AS

11.66.210

,

11.66.220

Possession of gambling records — AS

11.66.230

,

11.66.240

Possession of a gambling device — AS

11.66.260

Fine authorized upon conviction of violation — AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

Sentences for violations — AS

12.55.135

Original Code Provision — AS 11.60.140.

TD: IV, 115-117.

For gambling activities that may be lawfully conducted, see AS 05.15.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(a)(26), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, designated portions of (c) as (c)(1) and (2); in (c)(2), substituted “punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000” for “. Gambling is a Class B misdemeanor”; and made a stylistic change.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Conducting a lottery to determine entrants in a snowmobile race, in which the winner receives a cash prize, meets the statutory definition of lottery and, therefore, cannot be done without a permit.
Conducting a lottery without a permit would constitute gambling as defined by AS

11.66.280

(2).
December 4, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

A snowmobile race in which the winner receives a cash prize does not constitute gambling as defined by AS

11.66.280

(2), since the future contingent event in question in a race is definitely under a race participant’s control or influence. December 4, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.66.210.
Promoting gambling in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of promoting gambling in the first degree if the person promotes or profits from an unlawful gambling enterprise.

Promoting gambling in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.66.220.
Promoting gambling in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of promoting gambling in the second degree if the person promotes or profits from unlawful gambling.

Promoting gambling in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “promoting gambling,” “profits from gambling,” “unlawful,” “gambling,” “gambling enterprise” — AS

11.66.280

Gambling — AS

11.66.200

Possession of gambling records in the first and second degree — AS

11.66.230

,

11.66.240

Possession of a gambling device — AS

11.66.260

Original Code Provision — AS

11.60.010

; AS 11.60.140.

TD: IV, 117-119.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.66.230.
Possession of gambling records in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of possession of gambling records in the first degree if, with knowledge of its contents or character, the person possesses a gambling record used or intended to be used in the operation or promotion of an unlawful gambling enterprise.

Possession of gambling records in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 24 ch 102 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.66.240.
Possession of gambling records in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of possession of gambling records in the second degree if, with knowledge of its contents or character, the person possesses a gambling record.

Possession of gambling records in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.66.250.
Affirmative defenses.

It is an affirmative defense in a prosecution under AS

11.66.230

that the gambling record was possessed by the defendant solely as a player.

It is an affirmative defense in a prosecution under AS

11.66.230

or

11.66.240

that the gambling record

was not used or intended to be used by the defendant in the operation or promotion of unlawful gambling;

was used or intended to be used by the defendant in a social game.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “gambling record,” “unlawful,” “gambling enterprise,” “player,” “gambling,” “social game” — AS

11.66.280

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “possess” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Gambling — AS

11.66.200

Promoting gambling in the first and second degree — AS

11.66.210

,

11.66.220

Possession of a gambling device — AS

11.66.260

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: IV 119-120.

Sec. 11.66.260.
Possession of a gambling device.

A person commits the offense of possession of a gambling device if, with knowledge of the character of the device, the person manufactures, sells, transports, places, or possesses, or conducts or negotiates a transaction affecting or designed to affect ownership, custody, or use of, a gambling device knowing that the device is used or is to be used in unlawful gambling.

It is an affirmative defense in a prosecution under this section that the gambling device possessed by the defendant was used or intended to be used only in a social game.

Possession of a gambling device is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “gambling,” “gambling device,” “social game,” “unlawful” — AS 11.66.290

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “possess,” “affirmative defense” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Gambling — AS

11.66.200

Promoting gambling in the first and second degree — AS

11.66.210

,

11.66.220

Possession of gambling records in the first and second degree — AS

11.66.230

,

11.66.240

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: IV, 120-121.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.66.270.
Forfeiture.

If used in violation of AS

11.66.200

—

11.66.280

, the following property shall be forfeited:

a gambling device or gambling record;

money, not found on the person, used as a bet or stake;

money used as a bet or stake which is found on the person of one who conducts, finances, manages, supervises, directs, or owns all or part of an unlawful gambling enterprise.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “gambling device,” “gambling record,” “unlawful,” “gambling enterprise” — AS

11.66.280

Gambling offenses — AS

11.66.200

—

11.66.260

Original Code Provision — AS 11.45.040.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Wager slips or pool tickets used in carrying on a scheme involving wagering bookmaking or pool selling could be seized and forfeited as gambling implements under former AS 11.45.040, 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 22.

Sec. 11.66.280.
Definitions.

In AS

11.66.200

—

11.66.280

, unless the context requires otherwise,

"amusement device" includes arcade-style games, pinball machines, countertop machines, novelty arcade games, sports-themed games, shuffleboard tables, claw machines, pool tables, shooting galleries, bowling, and a similar machine, device, or apparatus that provides amusement, diversion, or entertainment; "amusement device" does not include casino-style games, draw games, slot machines, roulette wheels, craps, video poker, or any other game that is a contest of chance.

“contest of chance” means a contest, game, gaming scheme, or gaming device in which the outcome depends in a material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding that the skill of the contestants may also be a factor;

“gambling” means that a person stakes or risks something of value upon the outcome of a contest of chance or a future contingent event not under the person’s control or influence, upon an agreement or understanding that that person or someone else will receive something of value in the event of a certain outcome; “gambling” does not include

bona fide business transactions valid under the law of contracts for the purchase or sale at a future date of securities or commodities and agreements to compensate for loss caused by the happening of chance, including contracts of indemnity or guaranty and life, health, or accident insurance;

playing an amusement device that

confers only an immediate right of replay not exchangeable for something of value other than the privilege of immediate replay and does not contain a method or device by which the privilege of immediate replay may be cancelled or revoked;

confers only tickets, credits, allowances, tokens, or anything of value that can be redeemed for toys, candy, or electronic novelties offered at the same facility where the amusement device is located; or

allows a player to manipulate a claw machine or similar device within an enclosure and enables a person to receive merchandise directly from the machine;

an activity authorized by the Department of Revenue under AS 05.15; or

the permanent fund dividend raffle authorized under AS

43.23.230

;

“gambling device” means any device, machine, paraphernalia, or equipment that is used or usable in the playing phases of unlawful gambling, whether it consists of gambling between persons or gambling by a person involving the playing of a machine; “gambling device” does not include

lottery tickets, policy slips, or other items used in the playing phases of lottery or policy schemes; or

an amusement device;

“gambling enterprise” means a gambling business that

includes five or more persons who conduct, finance, manage, supervise, direct, or own all or part of the business;

has been or remains in substantially continuous operation for a period in excess of 30 days or has a gross income of $2,000 or more in any single day; and

is not a municipality or a qualified organization under AS

05.15.690

, except that, for purposes of this paragraph, no application for a license under AS 05.15 is required to be considered a qualified organization;

“gambling record” means any writing or paper of a kind commonly used in the operation or promotion of unlawful gambling and includes lottery tickets, policy slips, or other writings or papers used in the playing phases of lottery or policy schemes;

“player” means a person who engages in gambling solely as a contestant or bettor, believing that the risk of losing and the chances of winning are the same for all participants except for the advantages of skill and luck, without receiving or becoming entitled to receive any profit from gambling other than personal gambling winnings and without otherwise rendering any material assistance to the establishment, conduct, or operation of the particular gambling activity, except that, for purposes of this paragraph, a person who gambles at a social game on equal terms with the other participants does not “otherwise render material assistance” to the establishment, conduct, or operation by performing, without fee or remuneration, acts directed towards the arrangement or facilitation of the game, such as inviting persons to play, permitting the use of premises for the game, or supplying cards or other equipment used in the game;

“profits from gambling” means that a person, acting other than as a player, accepts or receives money or other property under an agreement or understanding with another person by which the person participates or is to participate in the proceeds of gambling;

“promoting gambling” means that a person, acting other than as a player, engages in conduct that materially aids any form of gambling; conduct of this nature includes

conduct directed toward the

creation or establishment of the particular gambling activity or acquisition or maintenance of premises, paraphernalia, equipment, or apparatus used in the gambling;

conduct of the playing phases of gambling; or

arrangement of the financial or recording phase of gambling or toward any other phase of its operation; or

having control or right of control over premises that are used with the defendant’s knowledge for purposes of gambling and permitting the gambling to occur or continue without making an effort to prevent its occurrence or continuation;

“social game” means gambling in a home where no house player, house bank, or house odds exist and where there is no house income from the operation of the game;

“something of value” means any money or property; any token, object, or article exchangeable for money or property; and any form of credit or promise directly or indirectly contemplating transfer of money or property or of an interest in money or property or involving extension of a service, entertainment, or privilege of playing at a game or scheme without charge;

“unlawful” means not specifically authorized by law.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 59 SLA 1983; am § 20 ch 14 SLA 1987; am E.O. No. 74 § 6 (1989); am E.O. No. 82 § 15 (1993); am §§ 1 — 3 ch 7 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 80 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

See

statutes appearing in AS

11.66.200

—

11.66.270

in which defined terms are used.

Original Code Provision — None.

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraph (1) was enacted as paragraph (12); renumbered in 2016, at which time paragraphs (2) — (12) were also renumbered for alphabetical consistency.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 15, 2016, in (3)(B), added (ii), (iii); in (4)(B), deleted “as described in (2)(B) of this section”; added (12) [now (1)].

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (3)(D), and made related changes.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For opinions construing former lottery laws, see 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10; 1962 Op. Att’y Gen., Nos. 14, 22; 1967 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Conducting a lottery to determine entrants in a snowmobile race, in which the winner receives a cash prize, meets the statutory definition of lottery and, therefore, cannot be done without a permit.
Conducting a lottery without a permit would constitute gambling as defined by paragraph (2).
December 4, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

A snowmobile race in which the winner receives a cash prize does not constitute gambling as defined by paragraph (2), since the future contingent event in question in a race is definitely under a race participant’s control or influence. December 4, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Token-operated bingo machines are illegal gambling devices, since they are not authorized under
AS 05.15, and, in fact, are expressly excepted from authorized charitable gaming activities that can be conducted by permittees under those statutes and former 15 AAC 105.
November 6, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Paying an entry fee to play a computer video game where a prize is awarded for a certain score or for the best score constitutes gambling under AS

11.66.280

. Receipt of a prize is based on the outcome of play, where both skill and chance can affect that outcome. 2001 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 19.